District of Columbia statutes.
19-115

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Domestic partner” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(3).

(2)

“Domestic partnership” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(4).

(3)

“Probate Court” means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 566, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 148 (2)(A)
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-79, § 5(j), 53 DCR 1035
1981 Ed., § 19-115.
1973 Ed., § 19-115.
D.C. Law 16-79 rewrote section which had read as follows: “For purposes of this chapter ‘Probate Court’ means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.”